Illinois, session 104th, SB2361.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/7)7    Sec. 7. Rules and standards for schools. The Board shall 8adopt rules and minimum standards for such schools which shall 9include, but not be limited to, the following:10        a. The curriculum for probationary law enforcement 11    officers which shall be offered by all certified schools 12    shall include, but not be limited to, courses of 13    procedural justice, arrest and use and control tactics, 14    search and seizure, including temporary questioning, civil 15    rights, human rights, human relations, cultural 16    competency, including implicit bias and racial and ethnic 17    sensitivity, criminal law, law of criminal procedure, 18    constitutional and proper use of law enforcement 19    authority, crisis intervention training, vehicle and 20    traffic law including uniform and non-discriminatory 21    enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code, traffic control 22    and crash investigation, techniques of obtaining physical 23    evidence, court testimonies, statements, reports, firearms   SB2361- 2 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    training, training in the use of electronic control 2    devices, including the psychological and physiological 3    effects of the use of those devices on humans, first aid 4    (including cardiopulmonary resuscitation), training in the 5    administration of opioid antagonists as defined in 6    paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the 7    Substance Use Disorder Act, handling of juvenile 8    offenders, recognition of mental conditions and crises, 9    including, but not limited to, the disease of addiction, 10    which require immediate assistance and response and 11    methods to safeguard and provide assistance to a person in 12    need of mental treatment, recognition of abuse, neglect, 13    financial exploitation, and self-neglect of adults with 14    disabilities and older adults, as defined in Section 2 of 15    the Adult Protective Services Act, crimes against the 16    elderly, training in investigating domestic minor sex 17    trafficking, law of evidence, the hazards of high-speed 18    police vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to 19    the high-speed chase, and physical training. The 20    curriculum shall include specific training in techniques 21    for immediate response to and investigation of cases of 22    domestic violence and of sexual assault of adults and 23    children, including cultural perceptions and common myths 24    of sexual assault and sexual abuse as well as interview 25    techniques that are age sensitive and are trauma informed, 26    victim centered, and victim sensitive. The curriculum   SB2361- 3 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    shall include training in techniques designed to promote 2    effective communication at the initial contact with crime 3    victims and ways to comprehensively explain to victims and 4    witnesses their rights under the Rights of Crime Victims 5    and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 6    The curriculum shall also include training in effective 7    recognition of and responses to stress, trauma, and 8    post-traumatic stress experienced by law enforcement 9    officers that is consistent with Section 25 of the 10    Illinois Mental Health First Aid Training Act in a peer 11    setting, including recognizing signs and symptoms of 12    work-related cumulative stress, issues that may lead to 13    suicide, and solutions for intervention with peer support 14    resources. The curriculum shall include a block of 15    instruction addressing the mandatory reporting 16    requirements under the Abused and Neglected Child 17    Reporting Act. The curriculum shall also include a block 18    of instruction aimed at identifying and interacting with 19    persons with autism and other developmental or physical 20    disabilities, reducing barriers to reporting crimes 21    against persons with autism, and addressing the unique 22    challenges presented by cases involving victims or 23    witnesses with autism and other developmental 24    disabilities. The curriculum shall include training in the 25    detection and investigation of all forms of human 26    trafficking. The curriculum shall also include instruction   SB2361- 4 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    in trauma-informed responses designed to ensure the 2    physical safety and well-being of a child of an arrested 3    parent or immediate family member; this instruction must 4    include, but is not limited to: (1) understanding the 5    trauma experienced by the child while maintaining the 6    integrity of the arrest and safety of officers, suspects, 7    and other involved individuals; (2) de-escalation tactics 8    that would include the use of force when reasonably 9    necessary; and (3) inquiring whether a child will require 10    supervision and care. The curriculum for probationary law 11    enforcement officers shall include: (1) at least 12 hours 12    of hands-on, scenario-based role-playing; (2) at least 6 13    hours of instruction on use of force techniques, including 14    the use of de-escalation techniques to prevent or reduce 15    the need for force whenever safe and feasible; (3) 16    specific training on officer safety techniques, including 17    cover, concealment, and time; and (4) at least 6 hours of 18    training focused on high-risk traffic stops. The 19    curriculum for permanent law enforcement officers shall 20    include, but not be limited to: (1) refresher and 21    in-service training in any of the courses listed above in 22    this subparagraph, (2) advanced courses in any of the 23    subjects listed above in this subparagraph, (3) training 24    for supervisory personnel, and (4) specialized training in 25    subjects and fields to be selected by the board. The 26    training in the use of electronic control devices shall be   SB2361- 5 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    conducted for probationary law enforcement officers, 2    including University police officers. The curriculum shall 3    also include training on the use of a firearms restraining 4    order by providing instruction on the process used to file 5    a firearms restraining order and how to identify 6    situations in which a firearms restraining order is 7    appropriate.8        b. Minimum courses of study, attendance requirements 9    and equipment requirements.10        c. Minimum requirements for instructors.11        d. Minimum basic training requirements, which a 12    probationary law enforcement officer must satisfactorily 13    complete before being eligible for permanent employment as 14    a local law enforcement officer for a participating local 15    governmental or State governmental agency. Those 16    requirements shall include training in first aid 17    (including cardiopulmonary resuscitation).18        e. Minimum basic training requirements, which a 19    probationary county corrections officer must 20    satisfactorily complete before being eligible for 21    permanent employment as a county corrections officer for a 22    participating local governmental agency.23        f. Minimum basic training requirements which a 24    probationary court security officer must satisfactorily 25    complete before being eligible for permanent employment as 26    a court security officer for a participating local   SB2361- 6 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    governmental agency. The Board shall establish those 2    training requirements which it considers appropriate for 3    court security officers and shall certify schools to 4    conduct that training. 5        A person hired to serve as a court security officer 6    must obtain from the Board a certificate (i) attesting to 7    the officer's successful completion of the training 8    course; (ii) attesting to the officer's satisfactory 9    completion of a training program of similar content and 10    number of hours that has been found acceptable by the 11    Board under the provisions of this Act; or (iii) attesting 12    to the Board's determination that the training course is 13    unnecessary because of the person's extensive prior law 14    enforcement experience.15        Individuals who currently serve as court security 16    officers shall be deemed qualified to continue to serve in 17    that capacity so long as they are certified as provided by 18    this Act within 24 months of June 1, 1997 (the effective 19    date of Public Act 89-685). Failure to be so certified, 20    absent a waiver from the Board, shall cause the officer to 21    forfeit his or her position.22        All individuals hired as court security officers on or 23    after June 1, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 24    89-685) shall be certified within 12 months of the date of 25    their hire, unless a waiver has been obtained by the 26    Board, or they shall forfeit their positions.  SB2361- 7 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        The Sheriff's Merit Commission, if one exists, or the 2    Sheriff's Office if there is no Sheriff's Merit 3    Commission, shall maintain a list of all individuals who 4    have filed applications to become court security officers 5    and who meet the eligibility requirements established 6    under this Act. Either the Sheriff's Merit Commission, or 7    the Sheriff's Office if no Sheriff's Merit Commission 8    exists, shall establish a schedule of reasonable intervals 9    for verification of the applicants' qualifications under 10    this Act and as established by the Board.11        g. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a 12    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete every 13    3 years. Those requirements shall include constitutional 14    and proper use of law enforcement authority; procedural 15    justice; civil rights; human rights; reporting child abuse 16    and neglect; autism-informed law enforcement responses, 17    techniques, and procedures; and cultural competency, 18    including implicit bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity. 19    These trainings shall consist of at least 30 hours of 20    training every 3 years.21        h. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a 22    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete at 23    least annually. Those requirements shall include law 24    updates, emergency medical response training and 25    certification, crisis intervention training, and officer 26    wellness and mental health.  SB2361- 8 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        i. Minimum in-service training requirements as set 2    forth in Section 10.6.3    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 4changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public Act 5102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022. 6(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-345, eff. 6-1-22; 7102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-982, eff. 87-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-949, eff. 1-1-25.) 9    Section 10. The Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act 10is amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 11    (325 ILCS 5/3)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2053)12    Sec. 3. As used in this Act unless the context otherwise 13requires: 14    "Adult resident" means any person between 18 and 22 years 15of age who resides in any facility licensed by the Department 16under the Child Care Act of 1969. For purposes of this Act, the 17criteria set forth in the definitions of "abused child" and 18"neglected child" shall be used in determining whether an 19adult resident is abused or neglected.20    "Agency" means a child care facility licensed under 21Section 2.05 or Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969 and 22includes a transitional living program that accepts children 23and adult residents for placement who are in the guardianship 24of the Department.   SB2361- 9 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    "Blatant disregard" means an incident where the real, 2significant, and imminent risk of harm would be so obvious to a 3reasonable parent or caretaker that it is unlikely that a 4reasonable parent or caretaker would have exposed the child to 5the danger without exercising precautionary measures to 6protect the child from harm. With respect to a person working 7at an agency in the person's professional capacity with a 8child or adult resident, "blatant disregard" includes a 9failure by the person to perform job responsibilities intended 10to protect the child's or adult resident's health, physical 11well-being, or welfare, and, when viewed in light of the 12surrounding circumstances, evidence exists that would cause a 13reasonable person to believe that the child was neglected. 14With respect to an agency, "blatant disregard" includes a 15failure to implement practices that ensure the health, 16physical well-being, or welfare of the children and adult 17residents residing in the facility. 18    "Child" means any person under the age of 18 years, unless 19legally emancipated by reason of marriage or entry into a 20branch of the United States armed services.21    "Department" means Department of Children and Family 22Services.23    "Local law enforcement agency" means the police of a city, 24town, village or other incorporated area or the sheriff of an 25unincorporated area or any sworn officer of the Illinois State 26Police.  SB2361- 10 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    "Abused child" means a child whose parent or immediate 2family member, or any person responsible for the child's 3welfare, or any individual residing in the same home as the 4child, or a paramour of the child's parent:5        (a) inflicts, causes to be inflicted, or allows to be 6    inflicted upon such child physical injury, by other than 7    accidental means, which causes death, disfigurement, 8    impairment of physical or emotional health, or loss or 9    impairment of any bodily function;10        (b) creates a substantial risk of physical injury to 11    such child by other than accidental means which would be 12    likely to cause death, disfigurement, impairment of 13    physical or emotional health, or loss or impairment of any 14    bodily function;15        (c) commits or allows to be committed any sex offense 16    against such child, as such sex offenses are defined in 17    the Criminal Code of 2012 or in the Wrongs to Children Act, 18    and extending those definitions of sex offenses to include 19    children under 18 years of age;20        (d) commits or allows to be committed an act or acts of 21    torture upon such child;22        (e) inflicts excessive corporal punishment or, in the 23    case of a person working for an agency who is prohibited 24    from using corporal punishment, inflicts corporal 25    punishment upon a child or adult resident with whom the 26    person is working in the person's professional capacity;   SB2361- 11 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        (f) commits or allows to be committed the offense of 2    female genital mutilation, as defined in Section 12-34 of 3    the Criminal Code of 2012, against the child;4        (g) causes to be sold, transferred, distributed, or 5    given to such child under 18 years of age, a controlled 6    substance as defined in Section 102 of the Illinois 7    Controlled Substances Act in violation of Article IV of 8    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act or in violation of 9    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 10    except for controlled substances that are prescribed in 11    accordance with Article III of the Illinois Controlled 12    Substances Act and are dispensed to such child in a manner 13    that substantially complies with the prescription; 14        (h) commits or allows to be committed the offense of 15    involuntary servitude, involuntary sexual servitude of a 16    minor, or trafficking in persons as defined in Section 17    10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 against the child. A 18    child shall be considered abused regardless of the 19    perpetrator of the abuse if the child is a human 20    trafficking victim as defined in Section 10-9 of the 21    Criminal Code of 2012; or 22        (i) commits the offense of grooming, as defined in 23    Section 11-25 of the Criminal Code of 2012, against the 24    child.25    A child shall not be considered abused for the sole reason 26that the child has been relinquished in accordance with the   SB2361- 12 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.2    "Neglected child" means any child who is not receiving the 3proper or necessary nourishment or medically indicated 4treatment including food or care not provided solely on the 5basis of the present or anticipated mental or physical 6impairment as determined by a physician acting alone or in 7consultation with other physicians or otherwise is not 8receiving the proper or necessary support or medical or other 9remedial care recognized under State law as necessary for a 10child's well-being, or other care necessary for the child's 11well-being, including adequate food, clothing and shelter; or 12who is subjected to an environment which is injurious insofar 13as (i) the child's environment creates a likelihood of harm to 14the child's health, physical well-being, or welfare and (ii) 15the likely harm to the child is the result of a blatant 16disregard of parent, caretaker, person responsible for the 17child's welfare, or agency responsibilities; or who is 18abandoned by the child's parents or other person responsible 19for the child's welfare without a proper plan of care; or who 20has been provided with interim crisis intervention services 21under Section 3-5 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and whose 22parent, guardian, or custodian refuses to permit the child to 23return home and no other living arrangement agreeable to the 24parent, guardian, or custodian can be made, and the parent, 25guardian, or custodian has not made any other appropriate 26living arrangement for the child; or who is a newborn infant   SB2361- 13 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1whose blood, urine, or meconium contains any amount of a 2controlled substance as defined in subsection (f) of Section 3102 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act or a metabolite 4thereof, with the exception of a controlled substance or 5metabolite thereof whose presence in the newborn infant is the 6result of medical treatment administered to the person who 7gave birth or the newborn infant. A child shall not be 8considered neglected for the sole reason that the child's 9parent or other person responsible for the child's welfare has 10left the child in the care of an adult relative for any period 11of time. A child shall not be considered neglected for the sole 12reason that the child has been relinquished in accordance with 13the Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act. A child shall not 14be considered neglected or abused for the sole reason that 15such child's parent or other person responsible for the 16child's welfare depends upon spiritual means through prayer 17alone for the treatment or cure of disease or remedial care as 18provided under Section 4 of this Act. A child shall not be 19considered neglected or abused solely because the child is not 20attending school in accordance with the requirements of 21Article 26 of The School Code, as amended.22    "Child Protective Service Unit" means certain specialized 23State employees of the Department assigned by the Director to 24perform the duties and responsibilities as provided under 25Section 7.2 of this Act.26    "Near fatality" means an act that, as certified by a   SB2361- 14 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1physician, places the child in serious or critical condition, 2including acts of great bodily harm inflicted upon children 3under 13 years of age, and as otherwise defined by Department 4rule.5    "Great bodily harm" includes bodily injury which creates a 6high probability of death, or which causes serious permanent 7disfigurement, or which causes a permanent or protracted loss 8or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ, or 9other serious bodily harm.10    "Person responsible for the child's welfare" means the 11child's parent; guardian; foster parent; relative caregiver; 12any person responsible for the child's welfare in a public or 13private residential agency or institution; any person 14responsible for the child's welfare within a public or private 15profit or not for profit child care facility; or any other 16person responsible for the child's welfare at the time of the 17alleged abuse or neglect, including any person who commits or 18allows to be committed, against the child, the offense of 19involuntary servitude, involuntary sexual servitude of a 20minor, or trafficking in persons for forced labor or services, 21as provided in Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 22including, but not limited to, the custodian of the minor, or 23any person who came to know the child through an official 24capacity or position of trust, including, but not limited to, 25health care professionals, educational personnel, recreational 26supervisors, members of the clergy, and volunteers or support   SB2361- 15 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1personnel in any setting where children may be subject to 2abuse or neglect.3    "Temporary protective custody" means custody within a 4hospital or other medical facility or a place previously 5designated for such custody by the Department, subject to 6review by the Court, including a licensed foster home, group 7home, or other institution; but such place shall not be a jail 8or other place for the detention of criminal or juvenile 9offenders.10    "An unfounded report" means any report made under this Act 11for which it is determined after an investigation that no 12credible evidence of abuse or neglect exists.13    "An indicated report" means a report made under this Act 14if an investigation determines that credible evidence of the 15alleged abuse or neglect exists.16    "An undetermined report" means any report made under this 17Act in which it was not possible to initiate or complete an 18investigation on the basis of information provided to the 19Department.20    "Subject of report" means any child reported to the 21central register of child abuse and neglect established under 22Section 7.7 of this Act as an alleged victim of child abuse or 23neglect and the parent or guardian of the alleged victim or 24other person responsible for the alleged victim's welfare who 25is named in the report or added to the report as an alleged 26perpetrator of child abuse or neglect.  SB2361- 16 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    "Perpetrator" means a person who, as a result of 2investigation, has been determined by the Department to have 3caused child abuse or neglect.4    "Member of the clergy" means a clergyperson or 5practitioner of any religious denomination accredited by the 6religious body to which the clergyperson or practitioner 7belongs.8(Source: P.A. 102-567, eff. 1-1-22; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 9102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 10    Section 15. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 11changing Section 5-915 as follows: 12    (705 ILCS 405/5-915)13    Sec. 5-915. Expungement of juvenile law enforcement and 14juvenile court records. 15    (0.05) (Blank).16    (0.1)(a) The Illinois State Police and all law enforcement 17agencies within the State shall automatically expunge, on or 18before January 1 of each year, except as described in 19paragraph (c) of this subsection (0.1), all juvenile law 20enforcement records relating to events occurring before an 21individual's 18th birthday if:22        (1) one year or more has elapsed since the date of the 23    arrest or law enforcement interaction documented in the 24    records;  SB2361- 17 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        (2) no petition for delinquency or criminal charges 2    were filed with the clerk of the circuit court relating to 3    the arrest or law enforcement interaction documented in 4    the records; and5        (3) 6 months have elapsed since the date of the arrest 6    without an additional subsequent arrest or filing of a 7    petition for delinquency or criminal charges whether 8    related or not to the arrest or law enforcement 9    interaction documented in the records.10    (b) If the law enforcement agency is unable to verify 11satisfaction of conditions (2) and (3) of this subsection 12(0.1), records that satisfy condition (1) of this subsection 13(0.1) shall be automatically expunged if the records relate to 14an offense that if committed by an adult would not be an 15offense classified as a Class 2 felony or higher, an offense 16under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or Criminal Code 17of 2012, or an offense under Section 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 1812-15, or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961. 19    (c) If the juvenile law enforcement record was received 20through a public submission to a statewide student 21confidential reporting system administered by the Illinois 22State Police, the record will be maintained for a period of 5 23years according to all other provisions in this subsection 24(0.1). 25    (0.15) If a juvenile law enforcement record meets 26paragraph (a) of subsection (0.1) of this Section, a juvenile   SB2361- 18 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1law enforcement record created:2        (1) prior to January 1, 2018, but on or after January 3    1, 2013 shall be automatically expunged prior to January 4    1, 2020; 5        (2) prior to January 1, 2013, but on or after January 6    1, 2000, shall be automatically expunged prior to January 7    1, 2023; and 8        (3) prior to January 1, 2000 shall not be subject to 9    the automatic expungement provisions of this Act. 10    Nothing in this subsection (0.15) shall be construed to 11restrict or modify an individual's right to have the person's 12juvenile law enforcement records expunged except as otherwise 13may be provided in this Act. 14    (0.2)(a) Upon dismissal of a petition alleging delinquency 15or upon a finding of not delinquent, the successful 16termination of an order of supervision, or the successful 17termination of an adjudication for an offense which would be a 18Class B misdemeanor, Class C misdemeanor, or a petty or 19business offense if committed by an adult, the court shall 20automatically order the expungement of the juvenile court 21records and juvenile law enforcement records. The clerk shall 22deliver a certified copy of the expungement order to the 23Illinois State Police and the arresting agency. Upon request, 24the State's Attorney shall furnish the name of the arresting 25agency. The expungement shall be completed within 60 business 26days after the receipt of the expungement order.  SB2361- 19 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    (b) If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or 2the chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in 3writing that certain information is needed for a pending 4investigation involving the commission of a felony, that 5information, and information identifying the juvenile, may be 6retained until the statute of limitations for the felony has 7run. If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or the 8chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in writing 9that certain information is needed with respect to an internal 10investigation of any law enforcement office, that information 11and information identifying the juvenile may be retained 12within an intelligence file until the investigation is 13terminated or the disciplinary action, including appeals, has 14been completed, whichever is later. Retention of a portion of 15a juvenile's law enforcement record does not disqualify the 16remainder of a juvenile's record from immediate automatic 17expungement.18    (0.3)(a) Upon an adjudication of delinquency based on any 19offense except a disqualified offense, the juvenile court 20shall automatically order the expungement of the juvenile 21court and law enforcement records 2 years or, in the case of a 22human trafficking victim as defined in Section 10-9 of the 23Criminal Code of 2012 adjudicated delinquent for prostitution, 24immediately after the juvenile's case was closed if no 25delinquency or criminal proceeding is pending and the person 26has had no subsequent delinquency adjudication or criminal   SB2361- 20 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1conviction. On the date that the minor's sentence ends or the 2date that the court enters an order committing the minor to the 3Department of Juvenile Justice, the juvenile court judge shall 4schedule a date to enter the automatic expungement order. The 5minor must be notified but shall not be required to be present 6for the scheduled court date when automatic expungement is to 7be ordered. If the minor is not yet eligible on the originally 8scheduled date, the court shall schedule a subsequent date to 9enter the automatic expungement order. The clerk shall deliver 10a certified copy of the expungement order to the Illinois 11State Police and the arresting agency. Upon request, the 12State's Attorney shall furnish the name of the arresting 13agency. The expungement shall be completed within 60 business 14days after the receipt of the expungement order. In this 15subsection (0.3), "disqualified offense" means any of the 16following offenses: Section 8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 179-3, 9-3.2, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-9, if the 18minor was not a human trafficking victim as defined in that 19Section, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 2011-6.5, 12-2, 12-3.05, 12-3.3, 12-4.4a, 12-5.02, 12-6.2, 2112-6.5, 12-7.1, 12-7.5, 12-20.5, 12-32, 12-33, 12-34, 12-34.5, 2218-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 18-6, 19-3, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 2324-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.5, 24-3A, 24-3B, 24-3.2, 24-3.8, 2424-3.9, 29D-14.9, 29D-20, 30-1, 31-1a, 32-4a, or 33A-2 of the 25Criminal Code of 2012, or subsection (b) of Section 8-1, 26paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 11-14.4, subsection   SB2361- 21 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1(a-5) of Section 12-3.1, paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of 2subsection (a) of Section 12-6, subsection (a-3) or (a-5) of 3Section 12-7.3, paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of 4Section 12-7.4, subparagraph (i) of paragraph (1) of 5subsection (a) of Section 12-9, subparagraph (H) of paragraph 6(3) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1.6, paragraph (1) of 7subsection (a) of Section 25-1, or subsection (a-7) of Section 831-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.9    (b) If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or 10the chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in 11writing that certain information is needed for a pending 12investigation involving the commission of a felony, that 13information, and information identifying the juvenile, may be 14retained in an intelligence file until the investigation is 15terminated or for one additional year, whichever is sooner. 16Retention of a portion of a juvenile's juvenile law 17enforcement record does not disqualify the remainder of a 18juvenile's record from immediate automatic expungement. 19    (0.4) Automatic expungement for the purposes of this 20Section shall not require law enforcement agencies to 21obliterate or otherwise destroy juvenile law enforcement 22records that would otherwise need to be automatically expunged 23under this Act, except after 2 years following the subject 24arrest for purposes of use in civil litigation against a 25governmental entity or its law enforcement agency or personnel 26which created, maintained, or used the records. However, these   SB2361- 22 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1juvenile law enforcement records shall be considered expunged 2for all other purposes during this period and the offense, 3which the records or files concern, shall be treated as if it 4never occurred as required under Section 5-923. 5    (0.5) Subsection (0.1) or (0.2) of this Section does not 6apply to violations of traffic, boating, fish and game laws, 7or county or municipal ordinances. 8    (0.6) Juvenile law enforcement records of a plaintiff who 9has filed civil litigation against the governmental entity or 10its law enforcement agency or personnel that created, 11maintained, or used the records, or juvenile law enforcement 12records that contain information related to the allegations 13set forth in the civil litigation may not be expunged until 14after 2 years have elapsed after the conclusion of the 15lawsuit, including any appeal. 16    (0.7) Officer-worn body camera recordings shall not be 17automatically expunged except as otherwise authorized by the 18Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera Act. 19    (1) Whenever a person has been arrested, charged, or 20adjudicated delinquent for an incident occurring before a 21person's 18th birthday that if committed by an adult would be 22an offense, and that person's juvenile law enforcement and 23juvenile court records are not eligible for automatic 24expungement under subsection (0.1), (0.2), or (0.3), the 25person may petition the court at any time at no cost to the 26person for expungement of juvenile law enforcement records and   SB2361- 23 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1juvenile court records relating to the incident and, upon 2termination of all juvenile court proceedings relating to that 3incident, the court shall order the expungement of all records 4in the possession of the Illinois State Police, the clerk of 5the circuit court, and law enforcement agencies relating to 6the incident, but only in any of the following circumstances:7        (a) the minor was arrested and no petition for 8    delinquency was filed with the clerk of the circuit court;9        (a-5) the minor was charged with an offense and the 10    petition or petitions were dismissed without a finding of 11    delinquency; 12        (b) the minor was charged with an offense and was 13    found not delinquent of that offense;14        (c) the minor was placed under supervision under 15    Section 5-615, and the order of supervision has since been 16    successfully terminated; or17        (d) the minor was adjudicated for an offense which 18    would be a Class B misdemeanor, Class C misdemeanor, or a 19    petty or business offense if committed by an adult; or .20        (e) the minor was adjudicated delinquent for 21    prostitution as a result of being a trafficking victim as 22    defined in Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 23    (1.5) At no cost to the person, the Illinois State Police 24shall allow a person to use the Access and Review process, 25established in the Illinois State Police, for verifying that 26the person's juvenile law enforcement records relating to   SB2361- 24 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1incidents occurring before the person's 18th birthday eligible 2under this Act have been expunged. 3    (1.6) (Blank).4    (1.7) (Blank).5    (1.8) (Blank). 6    (2) Any person whose delinquency adjudications are not 7eligible for automatic expungement under subsection (0.3) of 8this Section may petition the court at no cost to the person to 9expunge all juvenile law enforcement records relating to any 10incidents occurring before the person's 18th birthday which 11did not result in proceedings in criminal court and all 12juvenile court records with respect to any adjudications 13except those based upon first degree murder or an offense 14under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012 if the person is 15required to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act 16at the time the person petitions the court for expungement; 17provided that 2 years have elapsed since all juvenile court 18proceedings relating to the person have been terminated and 19the person's commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice 20under this Act has been terminated.21    (2.5) If a minor is arrested and no petition for 22delinquency is filed with the clerk of the circuit court at the 23time the minor is released from custody, the youth officer, if 24applicable, or other designated person from the arresting 25agency, shall notify verbally and in writing to the minor or 26the minor's parents or guardians that the minor shall have an   SB2361- 25 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1arrest record and shall provide the minor and the minor's 2parents or guardians with an expungement information packet, 3information regarding this State's expungement laws including 4a petition to expunge juvenile law enforcement and juvenile 5court records obtained from the clerk of the circuit court.6    (2.6) If a minor is referred to court, then, at the time of 7sentencing, dismissal of the case, or successful completion of 8supervision, the judge shall inform the delinquent minor of 9the minor's rights regarding expungement and the clerk of the 10circuit court shall provide an expungement information packet 11to the minor, written in plain language, including information 12regarding this State's expungement laws and a petition for 13expungement, a sample of a completed petition, expungement 14instructions that shall include information informing the 15minor that (i) once the case is expunged, it shall be treated 16as if it never occurred, (ii) the minor shall not be charged a 17fee to petition for expungement, (iii) once the minor obtains 18an expungement, the minor may not be required to disclose that 19the minor had a juvenile law enforcement or juvenile court 20record, and (iv) if petitioning the minor may file the 21petition on the minor's own or with the assistance of an 22attorney. The failure of the judge to inform the delinquent 23minor of the minor's right to petition for expungement as 24provided by law does not create a substantive right, nor is 25that failure grounds for: (i) a reversal of an adjudication of 26delinquency; (ii) a new trial; or (iii) an appeal.  SB2361- 26 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    (2.6-1) A trafficking victim, as defined by paragraph (10) 2of subsection (a) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 3may petition for vacation and expungement or immediate sealing 4of his or her juvenile court records and juvenile law 5enforcement records relating to events that resulted in the 6victim's adjudication of delinquency for an offense if 7committed by an adult would be a violation of the criminal laws 8occurring before the victim's 18th birthday upon the 9completion of his or her juvenile court sentence if his or her 10participation in the underlying offense was a result of human 11trafficking under Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or 12a severe form of trafficking under the federal Trafficking 13Victims Protection Act. 14    (2.7) (Blank).15    (2.8) (Blank).16    (3) (Blank). 17    (3.1) (Blank).18    (3.2) (Blank).19    (3.3) (Blank).20    (4) (Blank). 21    (5) (Blank).22    (5.5) Whether or not expunged, records eligible for 23automatic expungement under subdivision (0.1)(a), (0.2)(a), or 24(0.3)(a) may be treated as expunged by the individual subject 25to the records.26    (6) (Blank).  SB2361- 27 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    (6.5) The Illinois State Police or any employee of the 2Illinois State Police shall be immune from civil or criminal 3liability for failure to expunge any records of arrest that 4are subject to expungement under this Section because of 5inability to verify a record. Nothing in this Section shall 6create Illinois State Police liability or responsibility for 7the expungement of juvenile law enforcement records it does 8not possess. 9    (7) (Blank). 10    (7.5) (Blank).11    (8) The expungement of juvenile law enforcement or 12juvenile court records under subsection (0.1), (0.2), or (0.3) 13of this Section shall be funded by appropriation by the 14General Assembly for that purpose. 15    (9) (Blank). 16    (10) (Blank).17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-752, eff. 1-1-23; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 196-30-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-717, 20eff. 1-1-25; 103-787, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 20. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 22changing Sections 10-9, 11-18.1, 11-20.1, and 11-25 and by 23adding Section 11-27 as follows: 24    (720 ILCS 5/10-9)  SB2361- 28 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    Sec. 10-9. Trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 2and related offenses.3    (a) Definitions. In this Section:4    (1) "Intimidation" has the meaning prescribed in Section 512-6.6    (2) "Commercial sexual activity" means any sex act on 7account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or 8received by any person. 9    (2.5) "Company" means any sole proprietorship, 10organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 11venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 12limited liability limited partnership, limited liability 13company, or other entity or business association, including 14all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, 15parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 16associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit. 17    (3) "Financial harm" includes intimidation that brings 18about financial loss, criminal usury, or employment contracts 19that violate the Frauds Act.20    (4) (Blank).21    (5) "Labor" means work of economic or financial value.22    (6) "Maintain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 23secure continued performance thereof, regardless of any 24initial agreement on the part of the victim to perform that 25type of service.26    (7) "Obtain" means, in relation to labor or services, to   SB2361- 29 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1secure performance thereof.2    (7.5) "Serious harm" means any harm, whether physical or 3nonphysical, including psychological, financial, or 4reputational harm, that is sufficiently serious, under all the 5surrounding circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of 6the same background and in the same circumstances to perform 7or to continue performing labor or services in order to avoid 8incurring that harm. 9    (8) "Services" means activities resulting from a 10relationship between a person and the actor in which the 11person performs activities under the supervision of or for the 12benefit of the actor. Commercial sexual activity and 13sexually-explicit performances are forms of activities that 14are "services" under this Section. Nothing in this definition 15may be construed to legitimize or legalize prostitution.16    (9) "Sexually-explicit performance" means a live, 17recorded, broadcast (including over the Internet), or public 18act or show intended to arouse or satisfy the sexual desires or 19appeal to the prurient interests of patrons.20    (10) "Trafficking victim" means a person subjected to the 21practices set forth in subsection (b), (c), or (d).22    (b) Involuntary servitude. A person commits involuntary 23servitude when he or she knowingly subjects, attempts to 24subject, or engages in a conspiracy to subject another person 25to labor or services obtained or maintained through any of the 26following means, or any combination of these means:   SB2361- 30 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        (1) causes or threatens to cause physical harm to any 2    person;3        (2) physically restrains or threatens to physically 4    restrain another person;5        (3) abuses or threatens to abuse the law or legal 6    process;7        (4) knowingly destroys, conceals, removes, 8    confiscates, or possesses any actual or purported passport 9    or other immigration document, or any other actual or 10    purported government identification document, of another 11    person;12        (5) uses intimidation, or exerts financial control 13    over any person; or14        (6) uses any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to 15    cause the person to believe that, if the person did not 16    perform the labor or services, that person or another 17    person would suffer serious harm or physical restraint. 18    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 19or (f), a violation of subsection (b)(1) is a Class X felony, 20(b)(2) is a Class 1 felony, (b)(3) is a Class 2 felony, (b)(4) 21is a Class 3 felony, (b)(5) and (b)(6) is a Class 4 felony. 22    (c) Involuntary sexual servitude of a minor. A person 23commits involuntary sexual servitude of a minor when he or she 24knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or 25obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, 26provide, or obtain by any means, another person under 18 years   SB2361- 31 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1of age, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial 2sexual activity, a sexually-explicit performance, or the 3production of pornography, or causes or attempts to cause a 4minor to engage in one or more of those activities and:5        (1) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 6    between the ages of 17 and 18 years;7        (2) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 8    under the age of 17 years; or9        (3) there is overt force or threat.10    (c-5) Mistake of age not a defense. It is not a defense to 11a violation of this Section that the accused reasonably 12believed the trafficking victim to be 18 years of age or over. 13    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 14or (f), a violation of subsection (c)(1) is a Class 1 felony, 15(c)(2) is a Class X felony, and (c)(3) is a Class X felony. 16    (d) Trafficking in persons. A person commits trafficking 17in persons when he or she knowingly: (1) recruits, entices, 18harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, or 19attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or 20obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that 21the person will be subjected to involuntary servitude; or (2) 22benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from 23participation in a venture that has engaged in an act of 24involuntary servitude or involuntary sexual servitude of a 25minor. A company commits trafficking in persons when the 26company knowingly benefits, financially or by receiving   SB2361- 32 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1anything of value, from participation in a venture that has 2engaged in an act of involuntary servitude or involuntary 3sexual servitude of a minor.4    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 5or (f), a violation of this subsection by a person is a Class 1 6felony. A violation of this subsection by a company is a 7business offense for which a fine of up to $100,000 may be 8imposed.9    (e) Aggravating factors. A violation of this Section 10involving kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, aggravated 11criminal sexual assault or an attempt to commit aggravated 12criminal sexual assault, or an attempt to commit first degree 13murder is a Class X felony. 14    (f) Sentencing considerations.15        (1) Bodily injury. If, pursuant to a violation of this 16    Section, a victim suffered bodily injury, the defendant 17    may be sentenced to an extended-term sentence under 18    Section 5-8-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 19    sentencing court must take into account the time in which 20    the victim was held in servitude, with increased penalties 21    for cases in which the victim was held for between 180 days 22    and one year, and increased penalties for cases in which 23    the victim was held for more than one year.24        (2) Number of victims. In determining sentences within 25    statutory maximums, the sentencing court should take into 26    account the number of victims, and may provide for   SB2361- 33 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    substantially increased sentences in cases involving more 2    than 10 victims.3    (g) Restitution. Restitution is mandatory under this 4Section. In addition to any other amount of loss identified, 5the court shall order restitution including the greater of (1) 6the gross income or value to the defendant of the victim's 7labor or services or (2) the value of the victim's labor as 8guaranteed under the Minimum Wage Law and overtime provisions 9of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) or the Minimum Wage Law, 10whichever is greater.11    (g-1) A person who is a victim of involuntary sexual 12servitude of a minor is deemed a crime victim and is eligible 13for protections afforded to crime victims, including services 14under the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act, the Crime 15Victims Compensation Act, and the Abused and Neglected Child 16Reporting Act. 17    (g-5) Fine distribution. If the court imposes a fine under 18subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section, it shall be 19collected and distributed to the Specialized Services for 20Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund in accordance with Section 215-9-1.21 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 22    (h) Trafficking victim services. Subject to the 23availability of funds, the Department of Human Services may 24provide or fund emergency services and assistance to 25individuals who are victims of one or more offenses defined in 26this Section. These services shall include child welfare   SB2361- 34 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1protection for victims of the offense of involuntary sexual 2servitude of a minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of 3the Criminal Code of 2012, irrespective of the perpetrator of 4the offense.5    (i) Certification. The Attorney General, a State's 6Attorney, or any law enforcement official shall certify in 7writing to the United States Department of Justice or other 8federal agency, such as the United States Department of 9Homeland Security, that an investigation or prosecution under 10this Section has begun and the individual who is a likely 11victim of a crime described in this Section is willing to 12cooperate or is cooperating with the investigation to enable 13the individual, if eligible under federal law, to qualify for 14an appropriate special immigrant visa and to access available 15federal benefits. Cooperation with law enforcement shall not 16be required of victims of a crime described in this Section who 17are under 18 years of age. This certification shall be made 18available to the victim and his or her designated legal 19representative. 20    (j) A person who commits involuntary servitude, 21involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 22persons under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section is 23subject to the property forfeiture provisions set forth in 24Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 25(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 1-1-20.)   SB2361- 35 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    (720 ILCS 5/11-18.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 11-18.1)2    Sec. 11-18.1. Patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution. 3    (a) Any person who engages in an act of sexual penetration 4as defined in Section 11-0.1 of this Code with a person engaged 5in prostitution who is under 18 years of age or is a person 6with a severe or profound intellectual disability commits 7patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution.8    (a-5) Any person who engages in any touching or fondling, 9with a person engaged in prostitution who either is under 18 10years of age or is a person with a severe or profound 11intellectual disability, of the sex organs of one person by 12the other person, with the intent to achieve sexual arousal or 13gratification, commits patronizing a minor engaged in 14prostitution. 15    (b) (Blank). It is an affirmative defense to the charge of 16patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution that the accused 17reasonably believed that the person was of the age of 18 years 18or over or was not a person with a severe or profound 19intellectual disability at the time of the act giving rise to 20the charge.21    (c) Sentence. A person who commits patronizing a juvenile 22prostitute is guilty of a Class 3 felony, unless committed 23within 1,000 feet of real property comprising a school, in 24which case it is a Class 2 felony. A person convicted of a 25second or subsequent violation of this Section, or of any 26combination of such number of convictions under this Section   SB2361- 36 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1and Sections 11-14 (prostitution), 11-14.1 (solicitation of a 2sexual act), 11-14.3 (promoting prostitution), 11-14.4 3(promoting juvenile prostitution), 11-15 (soliciting for a 4prostitute), 11-15.1 (soliciting for a juvenile prostitute), 511-16 (pandering), 11-17 (keeping a place of prostitution), 611-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile prostitution), 11-18 7(patronizing a prostitute), 11-19 (pimping), 11-19.1 (juvenile 8pimping or aggravated juvenile pimping), or 11-19.2 9(exploitation of a child) of this Code, is guilty of a Class 2 10felony. The fact of such conviction is not an element of the 11offense and may not be disclosed to the jury during trial 12unless otherwise permitted by issues properly raised during 13such trial. 14(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 15    (720 ILCS 5/11-20.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 11-20.1)16    Sec. 11-20.1. Child pornography. 17    (a) A person commits child pornography who:18        (1) films, videotapes, photographs, or otherwise 19    depicts or portrays by means of any similar visual medium 20    or reproduction or depicts by computer any child whom he 21    or she knows or reasonably should know to be under the age 22    of 18 or any person with a severe or profound intellectual 23    disability where such child or person with a severe or 24    profound intellectual disability is:25            (i) actually or by simulation engaged in any act   SB2361- 37 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        of sexual penetration or sexual conduct with any 2        person or animal; or3            (ii) actually or by simulation engaged in any act 4        of sexual penetration or sexual conduct involving the 5        sex organs of the child or person with a severe or 6        profound intellectual disability and the mouth, anus, 7        or sex organs of another person or animal; or which 8        involves the mouth, anus or sex organs of the child or 9        person with a severe or profound intellectual 10        disability and the sex organs of another person or 11        animal; or12            (iii) actually or by simulation engaged in any act 13        of masturbation; or14            (iv) actually or by simulation portrayed as being 15        the object of, or otherwise engaged in, any act of lewd 16        fondling, touching, or caressing involving another 17        person or animal; or18            (v) actually or by simulation engaged in any act 19        of excretion or urination within a sexual context; or20            (vi) actually or by simulation portrayed or 21        depicted as bound, fettered, or subject to sadistic, 22        masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in any sexual 23        context; or24            (vii) depicted or portrayed in any pose, posture 25        or setting involving a lewd exhibition of the 26        unclothed or transparently clothed genitals, pubic   SB2361- 38 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        area, buttocks, or, if such person is female, a fully 2        or partially developed breast of the child or other 3        person; or4        (2) with the knowledge of the nature or content 5    thereof, reproduces, disseminates, offers to disseminate, 6    exhibits or possesses with intent to disseminate any film, 7    videotape, photograph or other similar visual reproduction 8    or depiction by computer of any child or person with a 9    severe or profound intellectual disability whom the person 10    knows or reasonably should know to be under the age of 18 11    or to be a person with a severe or profound intellectual 12    disability, engaged in any activity described in 13    subparagraphs (i) through (vii) of paragraph (1) of this 14    subsection; or15        (3) with knowledge of the subject matter or theme 16    thereof, produces any stage play, live performance, film, 17    videotape or other similar visual portrayal or depiction 18    by computer which includes a child whom the person knows 19    or reasonably should know to be under the age of 18 or a 20    person with a severe or profound intellectual disability 21    engaged in any activity described in subparagraphs (i) 22    through (vii) of paragraph (1) of this subsection; or23        (4) solicits, uses, persuades, induces, entices, or 24    coerces any child whom he or she knows or reasonably 25    should know to be under the age of 18 or a person with a 26    severe or profound intellectual disability to appear in   SB2361- 39 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    any stage play, live presentation, film, videotape, 2    photograph or other similar visual reproduction or 3    depiction by computer in which the child or person with a 4    severe or profound intellectual disability is or will be 5    depicted, actually or by simulation, in any act, pose or 6    setting described in subparagraphs (i) through (vii) of 7    paragraph (1) of this subsection; or8        (5) is a parent, step-parent, legal guardian or other 9    person having care or custody of a child whom the person 10    knows or reasonably should know to be under the age of 18 11    or a person with a severe or profound intellectual 12    disability and who knowingly permits, induces, promotes, 13    or arranges for such child or person with a severe or 14    profound intellectual disability to appear in any stage 15    play, live performance, film, videotape, photograph or 16    other similar visual presentation, portrayal or simulation 17    or depiction by computer of any act or activity described 18    in subparagraphs (i) through (vii) of paragraph (1) of 19    this subsection; or20        (6) with knowledge of the nature or content thereof, 21    possesses any film, videotape, photograph or other similar 22    visual reproduction or depiction by computer of any child 23    or person with a severe or profound intellectual 24    disability whom the person knows or reasonably should know 25    to be under the age of 18 or to be a person with a severe 26    or profound intellectual disability, engaged in any   SB2361- 40 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    activity described in subparagraphs (i) through (vii) of 2    paragraph (1) of this subsection; or3        (7) solicits, or knowingly uses, persuades, induces, 4    entices, or coerces, a person to provide a child under the 5    age of 18 or a person with a severe or profound 6    intellectual disability to appear in any videotape, 7    photograph, film, stage play, live presentation, or other 8    similar visual reproduction or depiction by computer in 9    which the child or person with a severe or profound 10    intellectual disability will be depicted, actually or by 11    simulation, in any act, pose, or setting described in 12    subparagraphs (i) through (vii) of paragraph (1) of this 13    subsection.14    (a-5) The possession of each individual film, videotape, 15photograph, or other similar visual reproduction or depiction 16by computer in violation of this Section constitutes a single 17and separate violation. This subsection (a-5) does not apply 18to multiple copies of the same film, videotape, photograph, or 19other similar visual reproduction or depiction by computer 20that are identical to each other. 21    (b)(1) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of 22child pornography that the defendant reasonably believed, 23under all of the circumstances, that the child was 18 years of 24age or older or that the person was not a person with a severe 25or profound intellectual disability but only where, prior to 26the act or acts giving rise to a prosecution under this   SB2361- 41 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1Section, he or she took some affirmative action or made a 2bonafide inquiry designed to ascertain whether the child was 318 years of age or older or that the person was not a person 4with a severe or profound intellectual disability and his or 5her reliance upon the information so obtained was clearly 6reasonable.7    (1.5) Telecommunications carriers, commercial mobile 8service providers, and providers of information services, 9including, but not limited to, Internet service providers and 10hosting service providers, are not liable under this Section 11by virtue of the transmission, storage, or caching of 12electronic communications or messages of others or by virtue 13of the provision of other related telecommunications, 14commercial mobile services, or information services used by 15others in violation of this Section. 16    (2) (Blank).17    (3) The charge of child pornography shall not apply to the 18performance of official duties by law enforcement or 19prosecuting officers or persons employed by law enforcement or 20prosecuting agencies, court personnel or attorneys, nor to 21bonafide treatment or professional education programs 22conducted by licensed physicians, psychologists or social 23workers. In any criminal proceeding, any property or material 24that constitutes child pornography shall remain in the care, 25custody, and control of either the State or the court. A motion 26to view the evidence shall comply with subsection (e-5) of   SB2361- 42 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1this Section. 2    (4) If the defendant possessed more than one of the same 3film, videotape or visual reproduction or depiction by 4computer in which child pornography is depicted, then the 5trier of fact may infer that the defendant possessed such 6materials with the intent to disseminate them.7    (5) The charge of child pornography does not apply to a 8person who does not voluntarily possess a film, videotape, or 9visual reproduction or depiction by computer in which child 10pornography is depicted. Possession is voluntary if the 11defendant knowingly procures or receives a film, videotape, or 12visual reproduction or depiction for a sufficient time to be 13able to terminate his or her possession.14    (6) Any violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or 15(7) of subsection (a) that includes a child engaged in, 16solicited for, depicted in, or posed in any act of sexual 17penetration or bound, fettered, or subject to sadistic, 18masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in a sexual context 19shall be deemed a crime of violence. 20    (c) If the violation does not involve a film, videotape, 21or other moving depiction, a violation of paragraph (1), (4), 22(5), (6), or (7) of subsection (a) is a Class 1 felony with a 23mandatory minimum fine of $2,000 and a maximum fine of 24$100,000. If the violation involves a film, videotape, or 25other moving depiction, a violation of paragraph (1), (4), 26(5), (6), or (7) of subsection (a) is a Class X felony with a   SB2361- 43 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1mandatory minimum fine of $2,000 and a maximum fine of 2$100,000. If the violation does not involve a film, videotape, 3or other moving depiction, a violation of paragraph (3) of 4subsection (a) is a Class 1 felony with a mandatory minimum 5fine of $1500 and a maximum fine of $100,000. If the violation 6involves a film, videotape, or other moving depiction, a 7violation of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) is a Class X 8felony with a mandatory minimum fine of $1500 and a maximum 9fine of $100,000. If the violation does not involve a film, 10videotape, or other moving depiction, a violation of paragraph 11(2) of subsection (a) is a Class 1 felony with a mandatory 12minimum fine of $1000 and a maximum fine of $100,000. If the 13violation involves a film, videotape, or other moving 14depiction, a violation of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) is a 15Class X felony with a mandatory minimum fine of $1000 and a 16maximum fine of $100,000. If the violation does not involve a 17film, videotape, or other moving depiction, a violation of 18paragraph (6) of subsection (a) is a Class 3 felony with a 19mandatory minimum fine of $1000 and a maximum fine of 20$100,000. If the violation involves a film, videotape, or 21other moving depiction, a violation of paragraph (6) of 22subsection (a) is a Class 2 felony with a mandatory minimum 23fine of $1000 and a maximum fine of $100,000.24    (c-5) Where the child depicted is under the age of 13, a 25violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7) of 26subsection (a) is a Class X felony with a mandatory minimum   SB2361- 44 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1fine of $2,000 and a maximum fine of $100,000. Where the child 2depicted is under the age of 13, a violation of paragraph (6) 3of subsection (a) is a Class 2 felony with a mandatory minimum 4fine of $1,000 and a maximum fine of $100,000. Where the child 5depicted is under the age of 13, a person who commits a 6violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7) of 7subsection (a) where the defendant has previously been 8convicted under the laws of this State or any other state of 9the offense of child pornography, aggravated child 10pornography, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, aggravated 11criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 12a child, or any of the offenses formerly known as rape, deviate 13sexual assault, indecent liberties with a child, or aggravated 14indecent liberties with a child where the victim was under the 15age of 18 years or an offense that is substantially equivalent 16to those offenses, is guilty of a Class X felony for which the 17person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 18than 9 years with a mandatory minimum fine of $2,000 and a 19maximum fine of $100,000. Where the child depicted is under 20the age of 13, a person who commits a violation of paragraph 21(6) of subsection (a) where the defendant has previously been 22convicted under the laws of this State or any other state of 23the offense of child pornography, aggravated child 24pornography, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, aggravated 25criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 26a child, or any of the offenses formerly known as rape, deviate   SB2361- 45 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1sexual assault, indecent liberties with a child, or aggravated 2indecent liberties with a child where the victim was under the 3age of 18 years or an offense that is substantially equivalent 4to those offenses, is guilty of a Class X 1 felony with a 5mandatory minimum fine of $2,000 $1,000 and a maximum fine of 6$100,000. The issue of whether the child depicted is under the 7age of 13 is an element of the offense to be resolved by the 8trier of fact. 9    (d) If a person is convicted of a second or subsequent 10violation of this Section within 10 years of a prior 11conviction, the court shall order a presentence psychiatric 12examination of the person. The examiner shall report to the 13court whether treatment of the person is necessary.14    (e) Any film, videotape, photograph or other similar 15visual reproduction or depiction by computer which includes a 16child under the age of 18 or a person with a severe or profound 17intellectual disability engaged in any activity described in 18subparagraphs (i) through (vii) or paragraph 1 of subsection 19(a), and any material or equipment used or intended for use in 20photographing, filming, printing, producing, reproducing, 21manufacturing, projecting, exhibiting, depiction by computer, 22or disseminating such material shall be seized and forfeited 23in the manner, method and procedure provided by Section 36-1 24of this Code for the seizure and forfeiture of vessels, 25vehicles and aircraft.26    In addition, any person convicted under this Section is   SB2361- 46 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1subject to the property forfeiture provisions set forth in 2Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 3    (e-5) Upon the conclusion of a case brought under this 4Section, the court shall seal all evidence depicting a victim 5or witness that is sexually explicit. The evidence may be 6unsealed and viewed, on a motion of the party seeking to unseal 7and view the evidence, only for good cause shown and in the 8discretion of the court. The motion must expressly set forth 9the purpose for viewing the material. The State's attorney and 10the victim, if possible, shall be provided reasonable notice 11of the hearing on the motion to unseal the evidence. Any person 12entitled to notice of a hearing under this subsection (e-5) 13may object to the motion.14    (f) Definitions. For the purposes of this Section:15        (1) "Disseminate" means (i) to sell, distribute, 16    exchange or transfer possession, whether with or without 17    consideration or (ii) to make a depiction by computer 18    available for distribution or downloading through the 19    facilities of any telecommunications network or through 20    any other means of transferring computer programs or data 21    to a computer.22        (2) "Produce" means to direct, promote, advertise, 23    publish, manufacture, issue, present or show.24        (3) "Reproduce" means to make a duplication or copy.25        (4) "Depict by computer" means to generate or create, 26    or cause to be created or generated, a computer program or   SB2361- 47 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    data that, after being processed by a computer either 2    alone or in conjunction with one or more computer 3    programs, results in a visual depiction on a computer 4    monitor, screen, or display.5        (5) "Depiction by computer" means a computer program 6    or data that, after being processed by a computer either 7    alone or in conjunction with one or more computer 8    programs, results in a visual depiction on a computer 9    monitor, screen, or display.10        (6) "Computer", "computer program", and "data" have 11    the meanings ascribed to them in Section 17.05 of this 12    Code.13        (7) For the purposes of this Section, "child 14    pornography" includes a film, videotape, photograph, or 15    other similar visual medium or reproduction or depiction 16    by computer that is, or appears to be, that of a person, 17    either in part, or in total, under the age of 18 or a 18    person with a severe or profound intellectual disability, 19    regardless of the method by which the film, videotape, 20    photograph, or other similar visual medium or reproduction 21    or depiction by computer is created, adopted, or modified 22    to appear as such. "Child pornography" also includes a 23    film, videotape, photograph, or other similar visual 24    medium or reproduction or depiction by computer that is 25    advertised, promoted, presented, described, or distributed 26    in such a manner that conveys the impression that the   SB2361- 48 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    film, videotape, photograph, or other similar visual 2    medium or reproduction or depiction by computer is of a 3    person under the age of 18 or a person with a severe or 4    profound intellectual disability. "Child pornography" 5    includes the depiction of a part of an actual child under 6    the age of 18 who, by manipulation, creation, or 7    modification, appears to be engaged in any activity 8    described in subparagraphs (i) through (vii) of paragraph 9    (1) of subsection (a). "Child pornography" does not 10    include images or materials in which the creator of the 11    image or materials is the sole subject of the depiction. 12    (g) Re-enactment; findings; purposes.13        (1) The General Assembly finds and declares that:14            (i) Section 50-5 of Public Act 88-680, effective 15        January 1, 1995, contained provisions amending the 16        child pornography statute, Section 11-20.1 of the 17        Criminal Code of 1961. Section 50-5 also contained 18        other provisions.19            (ii) In addition, Public Act 88-680 was entitled 20        "AN ACT to create a Safe Neighborhoods Law". (A) 21        Article 5 was entitled JUVENILE JUSTICE and amended 22        the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. (B) Article 15 was 23        entitled GANGS and amended various provisions of the 24        Criminal Code of 1961 and the Unified Code of 25        Corrections. (C) Article 20 was entitled ALCOHOL ABUSE 26        and amended various provisions of the Illinois Vehicle   SB2361- 49 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        Code. (D) Article 25 was entitled DRUG ABUSE and 2        amended the Cannabis Control Act and the Illinois 3        Controlled Substances Act. (E) Article 30 was entitled 4        FIREARMS and amended the Criminal Code of 1961 and the 5        Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. (F) Article 35 6        amended the Criminal Code of 1961, the Rights of Crime 7        Victims and Witnesses Act, and the Unified Code of 8        Corrections. (G) Article 40 amended the Criminal Code 9        of 1961 to increase the penalty for compelling 10        organization membership of persons. (H) Article 45 11        created the Secure Residential Youth Care Facility 12        Licensing Act and amended the State Finance Act, the 13        Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Unified Code of 14        Corrections, and the Private Correctional Facility 15        Moratorium Act. (I) Article 50 amended the WIC Vendor 16        Management Act, the Firearm Owners Identification Card 17        Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Criminal Code 18        of 1961, the Wrongs to Children Act, and the Unified 19        Code of Corrections.20            (iii) On September 22, 1998, the Third District 21        Appellate Court in People v. Dainty, 701 N.E. 2d 118, 22        ruled that Public Act 88-680 violates the single 23        subject clause of the Illinois Constitution (Article 24        IV, Section 8 (d)) and was unconstitutional in its 25        entirety. As of the time this amendatory Act of 1999 26        was prepared, People v. Dainty was still subject to   SB2361- 50 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        appeal.2            (iv) Child pornography is a vital concern to the 3        people of this State and the validity of future 4        prosecutions under the child pornography statute of 5        the Criminal Code of 1961 is in grave doubt.6        (2) It is the purpose of this amendatory Act of 1999 to 7    prevent or minimize any problems relating to prosecutions 8    for child pornography that may result from challenges to 9    the constitutional validity of Public Act 88-680 by 10    re-enacting the Section relating to child pornography that 11    was included in Public Act 88-680.12        (3) This amendatory Act of 1999 re-enacts Section 13    11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961, as it has been 14    amended. This re-enactment is intended to remove any 15    question as to the validity or content of that Section; it 16    is not intended to supersede any other Public Act that 17    amends the text of the Section as set forth in this 18    amendatory Act of 1999. The material is shown as existing 19    text (i.e., without underscoring) because, as of the time 20    this amendatory Act of 1999 was prepared, People v. Dainty 21    was subject to appeal to the Illinois Supreme Court.22        (4) The re-enactment by this amendatory Act of 1999 of 23    Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 relating to 24    child pornography that was amended by Public Act 88-680 is 25    not intended, and shall not be construed, to imply that 26    Public Act 88-680 is invalid or to limit or impair any   SB2361- 51 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    legal argument concerning whether those provisions were 2    substantially re-enacted by other Public Acts.3(Source: P.A. 102-567, eff. 1-1-22; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (720 ILCS 5/11-25)5    Sec. 11-25. Grooming.6    (a) A person commits grooming when he or she knowingly 7uses a computer on-line service, Internet service, local 8bulletin board service, or any other device capable of 9electronic data storage or transmission, performs an act in 10person or by conduct through a third party, or uses written 11communication to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, or attempt 12to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, a child, a child's 13guardian, or another person believed by the person to be a 14child or a child's guardian, to commit any sex offense as 15defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act, to 16distribute photographs depicting the sex organs of the child, 17or to otherwise engage in any unlawful sexual conduct with a 18child or with another person believed by the person to be a 19child. As used in this Section, "child" means a person under 17 20years of age. 21    (a-5) It is not a defense to a violation of this Section 22that the accused reasonably believed the child to be 17 years 23of age or over. 24    (b) Sentence. Grooming is a Class 4 felony. 25(Source: P.A. 102-676, eff. 6-1-22.)   SB2361- 52 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    (720 ILCS 5/11-27 new)2    Sec. 11-27. Selling travel services to facilitate sexual 3exploitation of a child.4    (a) In this Section, "child" means a person under 17 years 5of age.6    (b) A person commits selling travel services to facilitate 7sexual exploitation of a child when he or she knowingly sells 8or offers to sell travel services for the purpose of seducing, 9soliciting, luring, or enticing, or attempting to seduce, 10solicit, lure, or entice a person to travel to a location 11within this State to commit any sex offense as defined in 12Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act, to distribute 13photographs depicting the sex organs of the child, or to 14otherwise engage in any unlawful sexual conduct with a child 15or with another person believed by the person to be a child.16    (c) Sentence. Selling travel services to facilitate sexual 17exploitation of a child is a Class 4 felony. 18    Section 25. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 19amended by changing Section 116-2.1 as follows: 20    (725 ILCS 5/116-2.1)21    Sec. 116-2.1. Motion to vacate prostitution convictions 22for sex trafficking victims. 23    (a) A motion under this Section may be filed at any time   SB2361- 53 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1following the entry of a verdict or finding of guilty or an 2adjudication of delinquency under the Juvenile Court Act of 31987 where the conviction was under Section 11-14 4(prostitution) or Section 11-14.2 (first offender; felony 5prostitution) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 6Code of 2012 or a similar local ordinance and the defendant's 7participation in the offense was a result of having been a 8trafficking victim under Section 10-9 (involuntary servitude, 9involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 10persons) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 112012; or a victim of a severe form of trafficking under the 12federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act (22 U.S.C. Section 137102(13)); provided that:14        (1) a motion under this Section shall state why the 15    facts giving rise to this motion were not presented to the 16    trial court, and shall be made with due diligence, after 17    the defendant has ceased to be a victim of such 18    trafficking or has sought services for victims of such 19    trafficking, subject to reasonable concerns for the safety 20    of the defendant, family members of the defendant, or 21    other victims of such trafficking that may be jeopardized 22    by the bringing of such motion, or for other reasons 23    consistent with the purpose of this Section; and24        (2) reasonable notice of the motion shall be served 25    upon the State.26    (b) The court may grant the motion if, in the discretion of   SB2361- 54 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1the court, the violation was a result of the defendant having 2been a victim of human trafficking. Evidence of such may 3include, but is not limited to:4        (1) certified records of federal or State court 5    proceedings which demonstrate that the defendant was a 6    victim of a trafficker charged with a trafficking offense 7    under Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 8    Criminal Code of 2012, or under 22 U.S.C. Chapter 78;9        (2) certified records of "approval notices" or "law 10    enforcement certifications" generated from federal 11    immigration proceedings available to such victims; or12        (3) a sworn statement from a trained professional 13    staff of a victim services organization, an attorney, a 14    member of the clergy, or a medical or other professional 15    from whom the defendant has sought assistance in 16    addressing the trauma associated with being trafficked.17    Alternatively, the court may consider such other evidence 18as it deems of sufficient credibility and probative value in 19determining whether the defendant is a trafficking victim or 20victim of a severe form of trafficking.21    (c) If the court grants a motion under this Section, it 22must vacate the conviction and may take such additional action 23as is appropriate in the circumstances.24(Source: P.A. 97-267, eff. 1-1-12; 97-897, eff. 1-1-13; 2597-1150, eff. 1-25-13.)   SB2361- 55 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    Section 30. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended 2by changing Section 2 as follows: 3    (730 ILCS 150/2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 222)4    Sec. 2. Definitions. 5    (A) As used in this Article, "sex offender" means any 6person who is:7        (1) charged pursuant to Illinois law, or any 8    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 9    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law, with a sex 10    offense set forth in subsection (B) of this Section or the 11    attempt to commit an included sex offense, and:12            (a) is convicted of such offense or an attempt to 13        commit such offense; or14            (b) is found not guilty by reason of insanity of 15        such offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or16            (c) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 17        pursuant to Section 104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal 18        Procedure of 1963 of such offense or an attempt to 19        commit such offense; or20            (d) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 21        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 22        104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 23        for the alleged commission or attempted commission of 24        such offense; or25            (e) is found not guilty by reason of insanity   SB2361- 56 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        following a hearing conducted pursuant to a federal, 2        Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 3        foreign country law substantially similar to Section 4        104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of 5        such offense or of the attempted commission of such 6        offense; or7            (f) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 8        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to a 9        federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 10        state, or foreign country law substantially similar to 11        Section 104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 12        1963 for the alleged violation or attempted commission 13        of such offense; or14        (2) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 15    to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons Act, or any 16    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 17    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or18        (3) subject to the provisions of Section 2 of the 19    Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act; 20    or21        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to 22    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 23    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 24    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or25        (5) adjudicated a juvenile delinquent as the result of 26    committing or attempting to commit an act which, if   SB2361- 57 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    committed by an adult, would constitute any of the 2    offenses specified in item (B), (C), or (C-5) of this 3    Section or a violation of any substantially similar 4    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 5    or foreign country law, or found guilty under Article V of 6    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of committing or attempting 7    to commit an act which, if committed by an adult, would 8    constitute any of the offenses specified in item (B), (C), 9    or (C-5) of this Section or a violation of any 10    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 11    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law.12    Convictions that result from or are connected with the 13same act, or result from offenses committed at the same time, 14shall be counted for the purpose of this Article as one 15conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law is not a 16conviction for purposes of this Article.17     For purposes of this Section, "convicted" shall have the 18same meaning as "adjudicated".19    (B) As used in this Article, "sex offense" means:20        (1) A violation of any of the following Sections of 21    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012:22            10-9 (trafficking in persons, involuntary 23        servitude, and related offenses), 24            11-20.1 (child pornography),25            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 26        pornography),   SB2361- 58 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1            11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child),2            11-9.1 (sexual exploitation of a child),3            11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 4            11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 5        disability), 6            11-14.4 (promoting juvenile prostitution), 7            11-15.1 (soliciting for a juvenile prostitute),8            11-18.1 (patronizing a juvenile prostitute),9            11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 10        prostitution),11            11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),12            11-19.2 (exploitation of a child), 13            11-25 (grooming), 14            11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or traveling to 15        meet a child), 16            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 17            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 18        assault),19            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 20        assault of a child),21            11-1.50 or 12-15 (criminal sexual abuse),22            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 23        abuse),24            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child).25            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.26        (1.5) A violation of any of the following Sections of   SB2361- 59 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 2    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, the 3    defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense was 4    sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 5    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Act, and the offense was 6    committed on or after January 1, 1996:7            10-1 (kidnapping),8            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),9            10-3 (unlawful restraint),10            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint).11        If the offense was committed before January 1, 1996, 12    it is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 13    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 14    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 15    applies. 16        (1.6) First degree murder under Section 9-1 of the 17    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 18    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 19    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.20        (1.7) (Blank).21        (1.8) A violation or attempted violation of Section 22    11-11 (sexual relations within families) of the Criminal 23    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, and the offense 24    was committed on or after June 1, 1997. If the offense was 25    committed before June 1, 1997, it is a sex offense 26    requiring registration only when the person is convicted   SB2361- 60 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 2    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 3        (1.9) Child abduction under paragraph (10) of 4    subsection (b) of Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 5    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 committed by luring or 6    attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 into a motor 7    vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling place 8    without the consent of the parent or lawful custodian of 9    the child for other than a lawful purpose and the offense 10    was committed on or after January 1, 1998, provided the 11    offense was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of 12    the Sex Offender Management Board Act. If the offense was 13    committed before January 1, 1998, it is a sex offense 14    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 15    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 16    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 17        (1.10) A violation or attempted violation of any of 18    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 19    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 20    after July 1, 1999:21            10-4 (forcible detention, if the victim is under 22        18 years of age), provided the offense was sexually 23        motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender 24        Management Board Act,25            11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult),26            11-14.3 that involves soliciting for a prostitute,   SB2361- 61 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        or 11-15 (soliciting for a prostitute, if the victim 2        is under 18 years of age),3            subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) of Section 4        11-14.3, or Section 11-16 (pandering, if the victim is 5        under 18 years of age),6            11-18 (patronizing a prostitute, if the victim is 7        under 18 years of age),8            subdivision (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, or 9        Section 11-19 (pimping, if the victim is under 18 10        years of age).11        If the offense was committed before July 1, 1999, it 12    is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 13    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 14    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 15    applies. 16        (1.11) A violation or attempted violation of any of 17    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 18    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 19    after August 22, 2002:20            11-9 or 11-30 (public indecency for a third or 21        subsequent conviction).22        If the third or subsequent conviction was imposed 23    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring 24    registration only when the person is convicted of any 25    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 26    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies.   SB2361- 62 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        (1.12) A violation or attempted violation of Section 2    5.1 of the Wrongs to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the 3    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 4    (permitting sexual abuse) when the offense was committed 5    on or after August 22, 2002. If the offense was committed 6    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring 7    registration only when the person is convicted of any 8    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 9    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 10        (2) A violation of any former law of this State 11    substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 12    subsection (B) of this Section.13    (C) A conviction for an offense of federal law, Uniform 14Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state or a 15foreign country that is substantially equivalent to any 16offense listed in subsections (B), (C), (E), and (E-5) of this 17Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 18Article. A finding or adjudication as a sexually dangerous 19person or a sexually violent person under any federal law, 20Uniform Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state 21or foreign country that is substantially equivalent to the 22Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or the Sexually Violent Persons 23Commitment Act shall constitute an adjudication for the 24purposes of this Article.25    (C-5) A person at least 17 years of age at the time of the 26commission of the offense who is convicted of first degree   SB2361- 63 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1murder under Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 2Criminal Code of 2012, against a person under 18 years of age, 3shall be required to register for natural life. A conviction 4for an offense of federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, 5sister state, or foreign country law that is substantially 6equivalent to any offense listed in subsection (C-5) of this 7Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 8Article. This subsection (C-5) applies to a person who 9committed the offense before June 1, 1996 if: (i) the person is 10incarcerated in an Illinois Department of Corrections facility 11on August 20, 2004 (the effective date of Public Act 93-977), 12or (ii) subparagraph (i) does not apply and the person is 13convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph 14(2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies.15    (C-6) A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent 16of first degree murder as defined in Section 9-1 of the 17Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, against a 18person 18 years of age or over, shall be required to register 19for his or her natural life. A conviction for an offense of 20federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 21foreign country law that is substantially equivalent to any 22offense listed in subsection (C-6) of this Section shall 23constitute a conviction for the purpose of this Article. This 24subsection (C-6) does not apply to those individuals released 25from incarceration more than 10 years prior to January 1, 2012 26(the effective date of Public Act 97-154).   SB2361- 64 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    (D) As used in this Article, "law enforcement agency 2having jurisdiction" means the Chief of Police in each of the 3municipalities in which the sex offender expects to reside, 4work, or attend school (1) upon his or her discharge, parole or 5release or (2) during the service of his or her sentence of 6probation or conditional discharge, or the Sheriff of the 7county, in the event no Police Chief exists or if the offender 8intends to reside, work, or attend school in an unincorporated 9area. "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" includes 10the location where out-of-state students attend school and 11where out-of-state employees are employed or are otherwise 12required to register.13    (D-1) As used in this Article, "supervising officer" means 14the assigned Illinois Department of Corrections parole agent 15or county probation officer. 16    (E) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" means any 17person who, after July 1, 1999, is:18        (1) Convicted for an offense of federal, Uniform Code 19    of Military Justice, sister state, or foreign country law 20    that is substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 21    subsection (E) or (E-5) of this Section shall constitute a 22    conviction for the purpose of this Article. Convicted of a 23    violation or attempted violation of any of the following 24    Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 25    of 2012:26            10-5.1 (luring of a minor),  SB2361- 65 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1            11-14.4 that involves keeping a place of juvenile 2        prostitution, or 11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 3        prostitution),4            subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) of Section 11-14.4, 5        or Section 11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),6            subdivision (a)(4) of Section 11-14.4, or Section 7        11-19.2 (exploitation of a child),8            11-20.1 (child pornography),9            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 10        pornography),11            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault),12            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 13        assault),14            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 15        assault of a child),16            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 17        abuse),18            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child);19        (2) (blank);20        (3) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 21    to the Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or any substantially 22    similar federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 23    state, or foreign country law;24        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to 25    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 26    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military   SB2361- 66 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law;2        (5) convicted of a second or subsequent offense which 3    requires registration pursuant to this Act. For purposes 4    of this paragraph (5), "convicted" shall include a 5    conviction under any substantially similar Illinois, 6    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 7    or foreign country law;8        (6) (blank); or9        (7) if the person was convicted of an offense set 10    forth in this subsection (E) on or before July 1, 1999, the 11    person is a sexual predator for whom registration is 12    required only when the person is convicted of a felony 13    offense after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 14    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 15    (E-5) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 16means a person convicted of a violation or attempted violation 17of any of the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 18or the Criminal Code of 2012: 19        (1) Section 9-1 (first degree murder, when the victim 20    was a person under 18 years of age and the defendant was at 21    least 17 years of age at the time of the commission of the 22    offense, provided the offense was sexually motivated as 23    defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board 24    Act);25        (2) Section 11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person 26    with a disability);  SB2361- 67 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        (3) when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, 2    the defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense 3    was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 4    Offender Management Board Act, and the offense was 5    committed on or after January 1, 1996: (A) Section 10-1 6    (kidnapping), (B) Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 7    (C) Section 10-3 (unlawful restraint), and (D) Section 8    10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint); and9        (4) Section 10-5(b)(10) (child abduction committed by 10    luring or attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 11    into a motor vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling 12    place without the consent of the parent or lawful 13    custodian of the child for other than a lawful purpose and 14    the offense was committed on or after January 1, 1998, 15    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 16    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act).17    (E-10) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 18means a person required to register in another State due to a 19conviction, adjudication or other action of any court 20triggering an obligation to register as a sex offender, sexual 21predator, or substantially similar status under the laws of 22that State. 23    (F) As used in this Article, "out-of-state student" means 24any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 25predator who is enrolled in Illinois, on a full-time or 26part-time basis, in any public or private educational   SB2361- 68 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1institution, including, but not limited to, any secondary 2school, trade or professional institution, or institution of 3higher learning.4    (G) As used in this Article, "out-of-state employee" means 5any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 6predator who works in Illinois, regardless of whether the 7individual receives payment for services performed, for a 8period of time of 10 or more days or for an aggregate period of 9time of 30 or more days during any calendar year. Persons who 10operate motor vehicles in the State accrue one day of 11employment time for any portion of a day spent in Illinois.12    (H) As used in this Article, "school" means any public or 13private educational institution, including, but not limited 14to, any elementary or secondary school, trade or professional 15institution, or institution of higher education.16    (I) As used in this Article, "fixed residence" means any 17and all places that a sex offender resides for an aggregate 18period of time of 5 or more days in a calendar year. 19    (J) As used in this Article, "Internet protocol address" 20means the string of numbers by which a location on the Internet 21is identified by routers or other computers connected to the 22Internet.23(Source: P.A. 100-428, eff. 1-1-18.) 24    Section 35. The Crime Victims Compensation Act is amended 25by changing Section 6.1 as follows:   SB2361- 69 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    (740 ILCS 45/6.1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 76.1)2    Sec. 6.1. Right to compensation. A person is entitled to 3compensation under this Act if:4        (a) Timing. Within 5 years of the occurrence of the 5    crime, or within one year after a criminal charge of a 6    person for an offense, upon which the claim is based, the 7    applicant presents an application, under oath, to the 8    Attorney General that is filed with the Court of Claims 9    and on a form prescribed in accordance with Section 7.1 10    furnished by the Attorney General. If the person entitled 11    to compensation is under 18 years of age or under other 12    legal disability at the time of the occurrence or is 13    determined by a court to be under a legal disability as a 14    result of the occurrence, he or she may present the 15    application required by this subsection within 3 years 16    after he or she attains the age of 18 years or the 17    disability is removed, as the case may be. Legal 18    disability includes a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress 19    disorder. 20        (a-1) The Attorney General and the Court of Claims may 21    accept an application presented after the period provided 22    in subsection (a) if the Attorney General determines that 23    the applicant had good cause for a delay. 24        (b) Notification. The appropriate law enforcement 25    officials were notified within 72 hours of the   SB2361- 70 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    perpetration of the crime allegedly causing the death or 2    injury to the victim. If the notification was made more 3    than 72 hours after the perpetration of the crime and the 4    applicant establishes that the notice was timely under the 5    circumstances, the Attorney General and the Court of 6    Claims may extend the time for reporting to law 7    enforcement. 8        For victims of offenses defined in Sections 10-9, 9    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 12-13, and 10    12-14 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 11    2012, the appropriate law enforcement officials were 12    notified within 7 days of the perpetration of the crime 13    allegedly causing death or injury to the victim or, if the 14    notification was made more than 7 days after the 15    perpetration of the crime, the applicant establishes that 16    the notice was timely under the circumstances. 17        (b-1) If, in lieu of a law enforcement report, the 18    applicant or victim has obtained an order of protection, a 19    civil no contact order, or a stalking no contact order, 20    has presented to a medical facility for medical care or 21    sexual assault evidence collection, has presented to a 22    mental health provider for an independent medical 23    evaluation, or is engaged in a legal proceeding involving 24    a claim that the applicant or victim is a victim of human 25    trafficking or law enforcement use of force, such action 26    shall constitute appropriate notification under this   SB2361- 71 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    Section.2        (b-2) For purposes of notification under this Act, a 3    victim who presents to a medical facility shall provide 4    information sufficient to fulfill the requirements of this 5    Section, except that the victim shall not be required to 6    identify the offender to the medical provider. 7        (b-3) An applicant who is filing a claim that a law 8    enforcement officer's use of force caused injury or death, 9    may fulfill the notification requirement by complying with 10    subsection (b), filing a complaint with the Illinois Law 11    Enforcement Training Standards Board, filing a lawsuit 12    against a law enforcement officer or department, or 13    presenting evidence that the victim has obtained a 14    settlement or a verdict in a civil suit. An application 15    filed by an individual presenting evidence of a verdict in 16    a civil suit must be filed within one year after the 17    resolution of the civil suit. 18        (b-4) An applicant may provide notification to a 19    mental health provider regarding physical injuries of the 20    victim or for victims of offenses defined in Sections 21    10-9, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 22    11-14.4, 12-3.2, 12-3.3, 12-3.4, 12-7.3, 12-7.4 of the 23    Criminal Code of 2012, psychological injuries resulting 24    from the commission of the crime for which the applicant 25    is filing an application. The provider shall perform an 26    independent medical evaluation and provide the provider's   SB2361- 72 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1    professional opinion as to whether the injuries claimed 2    are consistent with having resulted from the commission of 3    the crime for which the applicant is filing an 4    application. 5        Upon completion of the independent medical evaluation, 6    the mental health provider shall complete a certification 7    form, signed under oath. The form shall be provided by the 8    Office of the Attorney General and contain the following: 9            (1) The provider's name, title, license number and 10        place of employment.11            (2) Contact information for the provider.12            (3) The provider's relationship with the 13        applicant.14            (4) The date the crime was reported to the 15        provider.16            (5) The reported crime.17            (6) The date and location of the crime.18            (7) If there are physical injuries, what injuries 19        that the mental health provider can attest to being 20        present on the day of the reporting if they are 21        consistent with the crime reported to the provider.22            (8) If there are psychological injuries, whether 23        the provider in his or her professional opinion 24        believes that the injuries presented on the day of the 25        reporting are consistent with the crime reported to 26        the provider.  SB2361- 73 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1            (9) A detailed summary of the incident, as 2        reported.3            (10) Any documentation or photos that relate to 4        the crime of violence for which the applicant is 5        seeking reimbursement. 6        (c) Cooperation. The applicant has cooperated with law 7    enforcement officials in the apprehension and prosecution 8    of the assailant. If the applicant or victim has obtained 9    an order of protection, a civil no contact order, or a 10    stalking no contact order, has presented to a medical 11    facility for medical care or sexual assault evidence 12    collection, obtained an independent medical examination 13    from a mental health provider as described in subsection 14    (b-4), has taken any of the actions described in 15    subsection (b-3), or is engaged in a legal proceeding 16    involving a claim that the applicant or victim is a victim 17    of human trafficking, such action shall constitute 18    cooperation under this subsection (c). If the victim is 19    under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the 20    offense, the following shall constitute cooperation under 21    this subsection (c): 22            (1) the applicant or the victim files a police 23        report with a law enforcement agency;24            (2) a mandated reporter reports the crime to law 25        enforcement; or26            (3) a person with firsthand knowledge of the crime   SB2361- 74 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1        reports the crime to law enforcement. 2        In evaluating cooperation, the Attorney General and 3    Court of Claims may consider the victim's age, physical 4    condition, psychological state, cultural or linguistic 5    barriers, and compelling health and safety concerns, 6    including, but not limited to, a reasonable fear of 7    retaliation or harm that would jeopardize the well-being 8    of the victim or the victim's family, and giving due 9    consideration to the degree of cooperation that the victim 10    or derivative victim is capable of in light of the 11    presence of any of these factors, or any other factor the 12    Attorney General considers relevant. 13        (d) If the applicant is not barred from receiving 14    compensation under Section 10.1.15        (e) (Blank).16        (f) (Blank).17        (f-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 18    to the contrary, a trafficking victim as defined in 19    Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 who is under 18 20    years of age is not subject to the filing requirements of 21    this Act and is not subject to the eligibility 22    requirements of this Act. 23        (g) (Blank).24    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 25the 101st General Assembly apply to actions commenced or 26pending on or after January 1, 2022.  SB2361- 75 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 103-1037, eff. 1-1-25.)  SB2361- 76 -LRB104 03861 RLC 13885 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    50 ILCS 705/74    325 ILCS 5/3from Ch. 23, par. 20535    705 ILCS 405/5-9156    720 ILCS 5/10-97    720 ILCS 5/11-18.1from Ch. 38, par. 11-18.18    720 ILCS 5/11-20.1from Ch. 38, par. 11-20.19    720 ILCS 5/11-2510    720 ILCS 5/11-27 new11    725 ILCS 5/116-2.112    730 ILCS 150/2from Ch. 38, par. 22213    740 ILCS 45/6.1from Ch. 70, par. 76.1